Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5951.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 1. As used in this act: (a) "Chemical agent" means a chemical that can rapidly produce sensory irritation or disabling physical effects to an individual and disappears within a short time following the termination of the exposure. Chemical agent includes, but is not limited to, any of the following: (i) Items commonly referred to as pepper balls, pepper spray, or oleoresin capsicum. (ii) Chloroacetophenone tear gas. (iii) 2-chlorobenzalmalononitrile gas. (b) "Department" means the department of state police. (c) "Kinetic energy projectile" means any type of device designed as less lethal that can be launched from any device as a projectile and may cause bodily injury through the transfer of kinetic energy and blunt force trauma. Kinetic energy projectile includes, but is not limited to, items commonly referred to as rubber bullets, plastic bullets, beanbag rounds, or foam-tipped plastic rounds. (d) "Law enforcement agency" means that term as defined in section 2 of the Michigan commission on law enforcement standards act, 1965 PA 203, MCL 28.602. (e) "Law enforcement officer" means that term as defined in section 2 of the Michigan commission on law enforcement standards act, 1965 PA 203, MCL 28.602. Sec. 2. Except as provided under section 3, a law enforcement officer shall not use a chemical agent or a kinetic energy projectile to disperse an assembly, a protest, or a demonstration. Sec. 3. A law enforcement officer shall only use a chemical agent or a kinetic energy projectile to disperse an assembly, a protest, or a demonstration if the law enforcement officer is trained on the use of the chemical agent or the kinetic energy projectile and if the use of the chemical agent or kinetic energy projectile is the objectively reasonable means to defend against a threat to life or serious bodily injury to an individual, including a law enforcement officer. Sec. 4. (1) Beginning on the effective date of this act, a law enforcement agency shall, not more than 60 days after the use of a chemical agent or kinetic energy projectile under section 3, submit a report to the department that includes all of the following information on the use of the chemical agent or kinetic energy projectile: (a) A description of the assembly, protest, or demonstration, including the approximate crowd size and the number of law enforcement officers present at the location of the assembly, protest, or demonstration. (b) The type of chemical agent or kinetic energy projectile used. (c) The number of rounds of the chemical agent or kinetic energy projectile that were used by a law enforcement officer. (d) Whether an individual was injured as a result of the use of the chemical agent or kinetic energy projectile by a law enforcement officer. (e) The reason the chemical agent or kinetic energy projectile was used, including the de-escalation tactics, protocols, and other measures that were taken to de-escalate tensions and avoid the necessity of using the chemical agent or kinetic energy projectile. (2) A law enforcement agency may request the department to allow the law enforcement agency an additional 30 days to submit the report under subsection (1). A law enforcement agency shall publish the report required under subsection (1) on its website.